Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.190

Technical advisory group.

(1) For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the director shall appoint a technical advisory group, chaired by the department. The technical advisory group shall have twelve members: Two members shall represent the department of ecology, six members shall represent resource protection well contractors or water well contractors, one member shall represent the department of health and be a person who regularly works on issues related to drinking water wells, one member shall represent local health departments and be a person who regularly works on issues related to drinking water wells, one member shall represent licensed professional engineers and be knowledgeable about the design and construction of wells, and one member shall be a licensed hydrogeologist knowledgeable about the design and construction of wells.

(2) The technical advisory group shall assist the department in the development and revision of rules; the preparation and revision of licensing examinations; the development of training criteria for inspectors, well contractors, and well operators; the establishment of continuing education providers; the development of evaluation procedures of all continuing education offerings; and the review of proposed changes to the minimum standards for construction and maintenance of wells by local governments for the purpose of achieving continuity with technology and state rules.

(3) The group shall meet at least twice each year to review rules and suggest any necessary changes.

(4) Each member of the group shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel expenses while engaged in the business of the group as prescribed in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2005 c 84 s 8; 1993 c 387 s 25.]